New Mexico, session 2026, HB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] ENERGY AFFORDABILITY AND GRID RELIABILITY COUNCIL CREATED--PURPOSE--MEMBERSHIP--PUBLIC REGULATION COMMISSION TO STAFF.-- A. The "energy affordability and grid reliability council" is created to: (1) evaluate strategies to protect consumers by maintaining affordable electric and natural gas utility rates while ensuring prudent and timely investment in grid modernization, reliability and resilience; (2) examine options to support additional energy production, generation capacity and infrastructure necessary to meet growing consumer demand and enhance economic development opportunities, consistent with the Energy Transition Act; (3) assess regulatory, financing and planning mechanisms that balance cost containment, reliability, emissions reduction and long-term system sustainability; (4) consider impacts on residential, rural, tribal and small business customers; (5) identify best practices from other states addressing similar energy transition and demand growth challenges; and (6) develop legislative, regulatory or administrative recommendations. B. The council consists of the following members: (1) one representative of the energy, minerals and natural resources department, designated by the secretary of energy, minerals and natural resources; (2) one representative with expertise in consumer or ratepayer advocacy, appointed by the governor; (3) one representative with expertise in electric or natural gas utility operations, generation, transmission or distribution, appointed by the governor; (4) one representative with expertise in economic development or workforce impacts related to energy policy, appointed by the governor; and (5) as advisory members, one representative from each investor-owned utility in the state. C. The governor shall appoint a chair and vice chair of the council. D. All members of the council serve at the pleasure of the governor. E. Public members of the council are entitled to per diem and mileage as provided in the Per Diem and Mileage Act and shall receive no other compensation, perquisite or allowance. F. The council is administratively attached to the public regulation commission. The commission shall staff the council. SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public regulation commission for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to pay costs associated with the energy affordability and grid reliability council. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 3 -